Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-269
Enforcement; appeal.

(1) The commission shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations necessary to carry out the Intrastate Pay-Per-Call Regulation Act.

(2) The commission may conduct investigations and shall enforce the act.

(3) Upon written complaint and supporting affidavit that an applicable rule or regulation or any provision of the act has been or is being violated, the commission may enter a cease and desist order on an ex parte basis against a party named in a complaint alleging violation of the act. The order shall have duration of no more than twenty days, and a hearing upon the complaint shall be held no later than twenty days after the order is entered by the commission.

(4) A decision of the commission made pursuant to the act and rules and regulations of the commission may be appealed. The appeal shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 1993, LB 42, § 10;

Laws 2000, LB 1285, § 18;

R.S.Supp.,2000, § 86-1110;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 131.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.